Idaho, session 2025, H0136.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 3, Title 41, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 41-351, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
41-351. 340B DRUG PRICING PROGRAM REPORTING. (1) As used in this sec-
tion, "340B covered entity" means an entity authorized to participate in the
federal 340B drug pricing program under section 340B(a)(4) of the federal
public health service act.
(2) Before April 1 of each year, a 340B covered entity shall report the
following information to the state department of health and welfare, the
state controller's office, and the attorney general concerning the 340B cov-
ered entity's participation in the federal 340B drug pricing program for the
previous calendar year:
(a) The name of the covered 340B entity;
(b) The aggregate acquisition cost for prescription drugs obtained un-
der the 340B program;
(c) The aggregate payment amount received for drugs obtained under the
340B program and dispensed to patients;
(d) The aggregate payment made to pharmacies under contract to dispense
drugs obtained under the 340B program;
(e) The number of claims for prescription drugs described in paragraph
(c) of this subsection; and
(f) How the 340B covered entity uses any savings from participating in
the 340B program, including the amount of savings used for the provision
of charity care, community benefits, or a similar program of providing
unreimbursed health care to the indigent.
(3) The information required to be reported pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section shall be reported by payer type, including the following:
(a) Commercial;
(b) Medicaid; and
(c) Medicare.
(4) The data submitted in the reports required pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section is confidential and shall not be made available for pub-
lic inspection.
(5) Before November 15 of each year, the state controller's office
shall prepare a report that aggregates the data submitted pursuant to sub-
section (2) of this section and:


(a) Submit the report to the legislative council in an electronic for-
mat; and
(b) Make such report available on the transparent Idaho website.
(6) The attorney general may use the information in the reports re-
quired pursuant to subsection (2) of this section for the purposes of
investigating medicaid fraud and ensuring compliance with health resources
and service administration requirements.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.